Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Law reviews:

For article, "Criminal Procedure", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with criminal procedure, see 61 Den. L.J. 281 (1984); for article, "Criminal Procedure", which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with criminal procedure, see 62 Den. U.L. Rev. 159 (1985); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with criminal procedure, see 66 Den. U. L. Rev. 717 (1989); for a discussion of Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with criminal procedure, see 67 Den. U. L. Rev. 701 (1990).

Section

16-1-101. Short title.

Articles 1 to 13 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Code of Criminal Procedure". Within those articles, the "Colorado Code of Criminal Procedure" is sometimes referred to as "this code".

The portion of any section, subsection, paragraph, or subparagraph contained in this code which precedes a list of examples, requirements, conditions, or other items may be referred to and cited as the "introductory portion" of such section, subsection, paragraph, or subparagraph.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 190, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-1-101.

16-1-102. Scope.

The provisions of this code are intended to create, define, and protect rights, duties, and obligations as distinguished from matters wholly procedural. Except as specifically set forth in this code, the provisions of this code are not applicable to proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code" or to violations of municipal charters or municipal ordinances.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 190, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-1-102.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Children's Code", see title 19.

16-1-103. Purpose.

This code is intended to provide for the just determination of every criminal proceeding. Its provisions shall be construed to secure simplicity in procedure, fairness in administration, the elimination of unjustifiable expense and delay, the effective apprehension and trial of persons accused of crime, the just determination of every criminal proceeding by a fair and impartial trial, an adequate review, and the preservation of the public welfare and the fundamental human rights of individuals.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 191, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-1-103.

16-1-104. Definitions.

The following definitions in this section are applicable generally in this code. Other terms which need definition, but which are used only in a limited number of sections of this code are defined in the particular section or article in which the terms appear. Definitions set forth in any section of this code are applicable whenever the same term is used in the same sense in another section of this code, unless the definition is specifically limited or the context indicates that it is inapplicable.

"Arraignment" means the formal act of calling the defendant into open court, informing him of the offense with which he is charged, and the entry of a plea to the charge.

"Bail" means a security, which may include a bond with or without monetary conditions, required by a court for the release of a person in custody set to provide reasonable assurance of public safety and court appearance.

(3.5) "Bail bonding agent" or "bonding agent" means an individual who is in the business of writing appearance bonds and who is subject to regulation by the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies, including an insurance producer, cash-bonding agent, or professional cash-bail agent.

"Bind over" means to require a defendant, following a preliminary hearing, to appear and answer in a court having jurisdiction to try the defendant for the crime with which he is charged.

"Bond" means a bail bond which is an undertaking, with or without sureties or security, entered into by a person in custody by which he binds himself to comply with the conditions of the undertaking and in default of such compliance to pay the amount of bail or other sum fixed, if any, in the bond.

"Charge" means a formal written statement presented to a court accusing a person of the commission of a crime. The charge may be made by complaint, information, or indictment.

"Complaint" means a written statement charging the commission of a crime by an alleged offender, filed in the county court.

(7.5) "Correctional facility" means any facility under the supervision of the department of corrections in which persons are or may be lawfully held in custody as a result of conviction of a crime.

"Court of record" means any court except a municipal court unless otherwise defined by a particular section.

(8.5) (a) (I) "Crime of violence" means a crime in which the defendant used, or possessed and threatened the use of, a deadly weapon during the commission or attempted commission of any crime committed against an elderly person or a person with a disability or a crime of murder, first or second degree assault, kidnapping, sexual assault, robbery, first degree arson, first or second degree burglary, escape, or criminal extortion, or during the immediate flight therefrom, or the defendant caused serious bodily injury or death to any person, other than himself or herself or another participant, during the commission or attempted commission of any such felony or during the immediate flight therefrom.

"Crime of violence" also means any unlawful sexual offense in which the defendant caused bodily injury to the victim or in which the defendant used threat, intimidation, or force against the victim. For purposes of this subparagraph (II), "unlawful sexual offense" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 18-3-411 (1), C.R.S., and "bodily injury" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 18-1-901 (3)(c), C.R.S.

The provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) shall apply only to felony unlawful sexual offenses.

As used in this subsection (8.5), "elderly person" means a person who is sixty years of age or older. "Person with a disability" means a person who is disabled because of the loss of or permanent loss of use of a hand or foot or because of blindness or the permanent impairment of vision in both eyes to such a degree as to constitute virtual blindness.

"Custody" means the restraint of a person's freedom in any significant way.

"Felony complaint" means a written statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged, signed by the prosecutor, and filed in the court having jurisdiction over the offense charged.

"Indictment" means a written statement, presented by a grand jury to the district court, which charges the commission of a crime by an alleged offender.

"Information" means a written statement signed by a district attorney presented to the district court, which charges the commission of a crime by an alleged offender.

"Personal recognizance" means a bond secured only by the personal obligation of the person giving the bond.

"Preliminary hearing" means a hearing on a complaint filed in the county court or an information filed in the district court, to determine if there is probable cause to believe that an offense has been committed and that the person charged committed it.

"Prosecuting attorney" means any attorney who is authorized to appear for and on behalf of the state of Colorado in a criminal case.

A "search warrant" is a written order made by a judge of a court of record commanding a peace officer to search the person, premises, place, property, or thing described in the search warrant and to seize property described or identified therein.

"Summons" means a written order or notice directing that a person appear before a designated court at a stated time and place and answer to a charge against him.

A "warrant" is a written order issued by a judge of a court of record directed to any peace officer commanding the arrest of the person named or described in the order.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 191, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-1-105.

L. 79:

(7.5) added, p. 678, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(8.5) added, p. 657, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(8.5)(a)(I) and (8.5)(b) amended, p. 1633, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3.5) added, (HB 12-1266), ch. 280, p. 1525, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) and (5) amended, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 820, § 1, effective May 11; (10) amended, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1426, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For mandatory sentences for crimes of violence, see § 18-1.3-406.

16-1-105. Interpretation of words and phrases.

In interpreting this code, such words and phrases as are defined in this article shall have the meanings indicated by their definitions, unless a particular context clearly requires a different meaning.

Words or phrases not defined in this code but which are defined in the "Colorado Criminal Code" (title 18, C.R.S.) shall have the meanings given therein except when a particular context clearly requires a different meaning.

Words and phrases used in this code and not expressly defined shall be construed according to the rules governing the construction of statutes of this state.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 191, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-1-104.

Cross references:

For statutory provisions concerning the construction of statutes, see article 4 of title 2.

16-1-106. Electronic transmission of documents required for arrest and search warrants under code authorized - definitions.

Whenever a written application for a warrant is required, it shall include both a written application and a sworn or affirmed affidavit. A peace officer may submit an application and affidavit for a warrant and the court may issue the warrant by an electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile or by an electronic transfer that may include an electronic signature. Whenever a sworn or affirmed affidavit is required, the court may orally administer the oath or affirmation to the affiant and the affiant may then electronically transmit back to the court a written affidavit of the oath or affirmation.

Procedures governing application for and issuance of arrest or search warrants consistent with this section may be established by rule of the Colorado supreme court, which rule should require the court administrator to establish paper quality and durability standards for warrants issued pursuant to this section.

Any electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile of a document authorized to be made by this section shall be treated as an original document.

A warrant, signed affidavit, and accompanying documents may be transmitted by electronic facsimile transmission or by electronic transfer with electronic signatures to the judge, who may act upon the transmitted documents as if they were originals. A warrant affidavit may be sworn to or affirmed by administration of the oath over the telephone by the judge. The affidavit with electronic signature received by the judge or magistrate and the warrant approved by the judge or magistrate, signed with electronic signature, shall be deemed originals. The judge or magistrate shall facilitate the filing of the original affidavit and original warrant with the clerk of the court and shall take reasonable steps to prevent tampering with the affidavit and warrant. The issuing judge or magistrate shall also forward a copy of the warrant and affidavit, with electronic signatures, to the affiant. This subsection (3) does not authorize the court to issue warrants without having in its possession either a faxed copy of the signed affidavit and warrant or an electronic copy of the affidavit and warrant with electronic signatures.

For purposes of this section:

"Digital signature" means a document hash-encrypted with a private cryptographic key that can be used to authenticate the identity of the sender of a message or the signer of a document and can ensure that the original content of the message or document that has been sent is unchanged.

"Digitized signature" means an electronic representation of an actual handwritten signature in which the image of a handwritten signature is created and saved using various methods, such as using a signature pad, scanning a handwritten signature, or digital photography. A digitized signature may be captured at the time the user applies the signature, or a previously saved image may be applied.

"Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document. An electronic signature may include, but is not limited to, a digitized signature or a digital signature.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 444, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2007:

(1) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 22, § 1, effective March 1.

L. 2011:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 11-1018), ch. 18, p. 46, § 2, effective March 11.

L. 2012:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 12-1095), ch. 49, p. 180, § 1, effective August 8.

16-1-107. Integrated court online network - municipal court records - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The report on the pilot project on criminal background checks for child care providers, prepared for the state department of human services, was presented to the general assembly in August of 2000;

Said report contained several recommendations for the improvement of the process of obtaining accurate and complete criminal history records for child care workers and volunteers;

Some of those recommendations involved the records contained in the integrated Colorado online network (ICON) of the state judicial department and the ability to identify case dispositions;

Other recommendations involved the work of the courts and the state judicial department in assisting in the completion and implementation of the integrated criminal justice information system program established by article 20.5 of this title.

The general assembly further finds and declares that, in order to assure that criminal background checks for child care workers are accurate and complete, it is critical that the criminal justice agencies participating in the integrated criminal justice information system program established by article 20.5 of this title and political subdivisions continue to work with each other to complete and implement such program in a timely manner and consider the integration of municipal records, including the county court records of the city and county of Denver, into such program.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 612, § 1, effective May 30.

16-1-108. Admission of records in court.

In a trial or hearing, all official records and documents of the state of Colorado, as defined in section 42-2-121 (2)(c), C.R.S., shall:

Be admissible in all county and district courts within the state of Colorado without further foundation;

Be statutory exceptions to rule 802 of the Colorado rules of evidence; and

Constitute prima facie proof of the information contained in the record or document if the record or document is accompanied by a certificate stating that the executive director of the department of revenue, or the executive director's appointee, has custody of the record or document and accompanied by and attached to a cover page that:

Specifies the number of pages, exclusive of the cover page, that constitute the record or document being submitted; and

Bears the signature of the executive director of the department of revenue, or the executive director's appointee, attesting to the authenticity of the record or document; and

Bears the official seal of the department of revenue or a stamped or printed facsimile of the seal.

As used in subsection (1) of this section, "official records and documents" includes any mechanically or electronically reproduced copy, photograph, or printout of a record or document or any portion of a record or document filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-2-121 (2)(c), C.R.S. The department of revenue may also permit the electronic transmission of information for direct recording in the department of revenue's records and systems. Information transmitted by an electronic means that is approved by the department of revenue constitutes an official record for the purposes of this section, regardless of whether an original source document for the information exists or ever existed. The certificate and cover page and its contents required by subsection (1) of this section may be electronically produced and transmitted. An electronic reproduction of the certificate and cover page, including an electronic signature of the executive director of the department of revenue or of the executive director's appointee and an electronic reproduction of the official seal of the department of revenue, shall be admissible in court as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

A record or document shall not be required to include every page of a record or document filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department of revenue pursuant to this section to be an official record or document, if the official record or document includes all of those portions of the record or document relevant to the trial or hearing for which it is prepared. There shall be a presumption that the official record or document contains all information that is relevant to the trial or hearing.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1379, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 765, § 24, effective June 1.

16-1-109. Eyewitness identification procedures - policies and procedures - training - admissibility - report - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Over the past forty years, a large body of peer-reviewed scientific research and practice has demonstrated that simple systematic changes in the administration of eyewitness identification procedures by all law enforcement agencies can greatly improve the accuracy of those identifications and strengthen public safety while protecting the innocent;

The integrity of Colorado's criminal justice system benefits from adherence to peer-reviewed research-based practices in the investigation of criminal activity; and

Colorado will benefit from the development and use of written law enforcement policies that are derived from peer-reviewed scientific research and research-based practices, which will ultimately improve the accuracy of eyewitness identification and strengthen the criminal justice system in Colorado.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Blind" means the administrator of a live lineup, photo array, or showup does not know the identity of the suspect.

"Blinded" means the administrator of a live lineup, photo array, or showup may know who the suspect is but does not know in which position the suspect is placed in the photo array when it is viewed by the eyewitness.

"Eyewitness" means a person who observed another person at or near the scene of an offense.

"Filler" means either a person or a photograph of a person who is not suspected of the offense in question and is included in an identification procedure.

"Live lineup" means an identification procedure in which a group of persons, including the suspected perpetrator of an offense and other persons who are not suspected of the offense, is displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the suspect as the perpetrator.

"Peace officers standards and training board" or "P.O.S.T. board" means the board created in section 24-31-302, C.R.S., for the certification of peace officers in Colorado.

"Photo array" means an identification procedure in which an array of photographs, including a photograph of the suspected perpetrator of an offense and additional photographs of other persons who are not suspected of the offense, is displayed to an eyewitness either in hard copy form or via electronic means for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the suspect as the perpetrator.

"Showup" means an identification procedure in which an eyewitness is presented with a single subject in person for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the individual as the suspect.

On or before November 15, 2021, any Colorado law enforcement agency that employs a peace officer required to be P.O.S.T.-certified pursuant to section 16-2.5-102, that is charged with enforcing the criminal laws of Colorado, and that, as part of any criminal investigation, uses or might use any eyewitness identification procedure shall adopt written policies and procedures concerning law-enforcement-conducted eyewitness identifications. The policies and procedures adopted and implemented by a law enforcement agency must be consistent with eyewitness identification procedures of nationally recognized peer-reviewed research and must be consistent with the requirements of section 16-1-110 for admissibility of evidence of eyewitness identification. The attorney general, the Colorado district attorneys' council, representatives of law enforcement, and representatives of the state public defender office, in consultation with an organization that is familiar with the research regarding eyewitness identification and supports the exoneration of persons who have been wrongfully convicted, shall develop and recommend a set of model policies and procedures that are consistent with the requirements of this section and section 16-1-110 and update the policies and procedures as necessary. The policies and procedures must include, but need not be limited to, the following:

Protocols guiding the use of a showup;

Protocols guiding the recommended use of a blind administration of both photo arrays and live lineups or the recommended use of a blinded administration of the identification process when circumstances prevent the use of a blind administration;

The development of a set of easily understood instructions for eyewitnesses that, at a minimum, advise the eyewitness that the alleged perpetrator may or may not be present in the photo array or live lineup and that the investigation will continue whether or not the eyewitness identifies anyone as the alleged perpetrator in the photo array or live lineup;

Instructions to the law enforcement agency regarding the appropriate choice and use of fillers in compiling a live lineup or photo array, including ensuring that fillers match the original description of the perpetrator; and

Protocols regarding the documentation of the eyewitness' level of confidence as elicited at the time he or she first identifies an alleged perpetrator or other person and memorialized verbatim in writing.

Repealed.

Local law enforcement policies and procedures relating to eyewitness identification are public documents. All such policies and procedures must be available, without cost, to the public upon request pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Subject to available resources, law enforcement shall create, conduct, or facilitate professional training programs for law enforcement officers and other relevant personnel on methods and technical aspects of eyewitness identification policies and procedures. While these training programs shall be approved by the P.O.S.T. board, any programs may be created, provided, and conducted by any law enforcement agency, the office of the attorney general, the Colorado district attorneys' council, or any other P.O.S.T-approved training entity.

Policies and procedures adopted and implemented by a law enforcement agency pursuant to this section must be reviewed by the agency at least every five years to ensure the policies and procedures are updated to include best practices recognized by nationally recognized peer-reviewed research.

Compliance or failure to comply with any of the requirements of this section and the requirements of section 16-1-110 is considered relevant evidence in any case involving eyewitness identification, as long as such evidence is otherwise admissible.

Beginning January 1, 2022, each law enforcement agency that uses a showup shall collect the following data related to those identification techniques:

The date, time, and location of the showup;

The gender, age, and race of the subject and eyewitness in the showup, as determined by the law enforcement officer's perception or the subject's identification or retrieved from a database accessible by law enforcement;

The alleged crime; and

The outcome of the showup.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-058), ch. 110, p. 321, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(h), IP(3)(a), (4), and (5) amended, (3)(b) repealed, and (6) added, (HB 21-1142), ch. 312, p. 1902, § 2, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1142, see section 1 of chapter 312, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

16-1-110. Regulation of showup identification procedures - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"P.O.S.T.-certified" means certified by the peace officers standards and training board created in section 24-31-302.

"Showup" means an identification procedure in which an eyewitness is presented with a single subject in person for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness identifies the individual as the suspect.

A peace officer may utilize a showup only pursuant to the following conditions:

Following the report of a crime, a peace officer, acting on reasonable suspicion, has detained a subject in the crime within minutes of the commission of the crime and near the location of the crime;

Given the circumstances, neither a live lineup nor a photo array are available as a means of identification; and

The eyewitness reasonably believes he or she can identify the subject.

To verify the identity of an intimate relationship, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (2), in a domestic violence case; or

To confirm the identity of a familial subject, including a parent, child, or sibling known to the eyewitness.

A peace officer shall not require the person subject to the showup to put on described clothing worn by the suspect, speak specific words uttered by the suspect, or perform any specific actions mimicking those of the suspect that occurred during the commission of the reported crime;

A peace officer shall not show the person subject to the showup to the eyewitness while the person was in handcuffs or in the back of a patrol vehicle, except in circumstances to prevent an imminent threat of physical harm to a peace officer or another person or the escape of the subject;

When multiple eyewitnesses exist, a peace officer shall permit only one eyewitness at a time to view the person subject to the showup;

When multiple subjects exist, a peace officer shall separate the subjects and conduct separate showups with each subject;

A peace officer shall separate the eyewitnesses from one another;

When conducting a showup with an eyewitness who has limited English proficiency or who is hearing impaired or deaf, a peace officer, if feasible, shall obtain an interpreter before proceeding with the showup. The lack of an interpreter does not preclude use of evidence derived from the showup procedure if a court finds the identification is sufficiently or nevertheless reliable.

A peace officer shall give the admonition required by subsection (3)(d) of this section prior to conducting the showup;

If a peace officer is not required to wear a body-worn camera, prior to the showup, a peace officer or another person authorized by the peace officer shall photograph or use a body-worn camera to capture video that shows clearly and without obstruction each subject at the place of the showup to preserve a record of the appearance of the subject at the time of the showup. This subsection (3)(a)(XI)(A) is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

No later than January 1, 2023, using a body-worn camera, a peace officer shall record a video of the entirety of the showup procedure including each subject to preserve a record of the appearance of the subject at the time of the showup and the location and conditions of the showup, the admonition a peace officer is required to provide to an eyewitness as required by subsection (3)(d) of this section, and the eyewitness confidence statement required by subsection (3)(a)(XII) of this section.

If an eyewitness makes an identification during a showup, a peace officer shall ask the eyewitness whether the eyewitness is confident, somewhat confident, or not confident about the identification. If an eyewitness makes an identification, a peace officer, at the time of the identification, shall take a clear statement from the eyewitness and document the statement in the eyewitness's own words. If an eyewitness makes an identification and an arrest occurs, any further acts to obtain an additional identification by subsequent eyewitnesses must be through a live lineup or photo array.

Beginning January 1, 2022, for showups conducted on or after this date, when a law enforcement agency that employs peace officers required to be P.O.S.T.-certified pursuant to section 16-2.5-102 or a P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer conducts a showup, the peace officer shall comply with the following provisions:

(I) A peace officer shall transport the eyewitnesses separately to the location of the person subject to the showup;

(II) The showup location must be as well-lit as practicable with an unobstructed view of the person subject to the showup;

(III) A peace officer shall avoid external factors that can be suggestive to the eyewitness, such as verbal comments, computer screen data, or any other information concerning the person subject to the showup;

The court shall consider any failure by law enforcement to comply with the requirements of this section with respect to any challenge to a showup identification.

A P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer shall document the time and location of the showup and read the showup advisement required by subsection (3)(d) of this section to each eyewitness. The officer shall document the procedure in the officer's written statement and, beginning July 1, 2023, record the showup in its entirety with the officer's body-worn camera.

When conducting a showup, a P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer shall verbally communicate to the eyewitness the substance of the following statements:

You should not assume the person you are about to see has committed a crime;

We could be showing you a person for many reasons, including to clear the person from investigation;

Eliminating a person from an investigation serves an equally important purpose as identifying a person who might have been involved in the criminal activity;

The investigation of this matter will continue whether or not you identify a person;

Apart from individual assistance and cooperation with law enforcement, we cannot discuss the investigation with you; and

Please do not discuss what you saw, said, or did during this procedure with any other eyewitness.

The P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer shall ask the eyewitness if they understand the instructions, if they agree to comply with the instructions, and if they have any questions before the identification procedure begins. The eyewitness must respond affirmatively in order for the showup to proceed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1142), ch. 312, p. 1904, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1142, see section 1 of chapter 312, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.